Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1273YC (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 15.119, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 g. The workforce housing tax incentives program administered 3 pursuant to subchapter II, part 17 . In allocating tax credits 4 pursuant to this subsection , the authority shall not allocate 5 more than thirty-five fifty million dollars for purposes of 6 this paragraph. Of the moneys allocated under this paragraph, 7 seventeen twenty-five million five hundred thousand dollars 8 shall be reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects 9 in small cities, as defined in section 15.352 , that are 10 registered on or after July 1, 2017. 11